Colorado, session 2026A, HB1195.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-245-224, amend
(1)(w) and (1)(x); and add (1)(y) as follows:
12-245-224. Prohibited activities - related provisions - definition.
(1) A person licensed, registered, or certified under this article 245
violates this article 245 if the person:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(w) Has sold or fraudulently obtained or furnished a license,
registration, or certification to practice as a psychologist, social worker,
marriage and family therapist, licensed professional counselor,
psychotherapist, or addiction counselor or has aided or abetted in those
activities; or
(x) Has failed to respond, in the manner required by the board, to a
complaint filed with or by the board against the licensee, registrant, or
certificate holder; OR
(y) FAILS TO COMPLY WITH SECTION 12-245-224.5 CONCERNING THE
USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEMS.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 12-245-224.5 as
follows:
12-245-224.5. Use of artificial intelligence systems for
psychotherapy services - permitted use by regulated individuals -
consent - use in educational and training settings and research -
prohibited use - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) (I) "ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT" MEANS TASKS THAT:
(A) ARE PERFORMED TO ASSIST A LICENSEE, REGISTRANT,
CERTIFICATE HOLDER, OR OTHER INDIVIDUAL LAWFULLY PERMITTED TO
PROVIDE PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES IN THE STATE IN THE DELIVERY OF
PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES; AND
(B) DO NOT INVOLVE THERAPEUTIC COMMUNICATION.
(II) "ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT" INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING, AT A
MINIMUM:
(A) MANAGING APPOINTMENT SCHEDULING AND REMINDERS;
(B) PROCESSING BILLING AND INSURANCE CLAIMS; AND
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1195

(C) DRAFTING GENERAL COMMUNICATIONS RELATED TO THERAPY
LOGISTICS THAT DO NOT INCLUDE THERAPEUTIC ADVICE.
(b) "ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM" MEANS ANY
MACHINE-BASED SYSTEM THAT, FOR ANY EXPLICIT OR IMPLICIT OBJECTIVE,
INFERS FROM THE INPUTS THE SYSTEM RECEIVES HOW TO GENERATE
OUTPUTS, INCLUDING CONTENT, DECISIONS, PREDICTIONS, OR
RECOMMENDATIONS, THAT CAN INFLUENCE PHYSICAL OR VIRTUAL
ENVIRONMENTS.
(c) (I) "CONSENT" MEANS A CLEAR, EXPLICIT, AFFIRMATIVE,
SPECIFIC, AND UNAMBIGUOUS WRITTEN AGREEMENT, INCLUDING A WRITTEN
AGREEMENT PROVIDED BY ELECTRONIC MEANS, ENTERED INTO BY AN
INDIVIDUAL THAT IS REVOCABLE BY THE INDIVIDUAL.
(II) "CONSENT" DOES NOT INCLUDE AN AGREEMENT THAT IS
OBTAINED BY ANY OF THE FOLLOWING MEANS:
(A) THE ACCEPTANCE OF A GENERAL OR BROAD TERMS OF USE
AGREEMENT OR A SIMILAR DOCUMENT THAT CONTAINS DESCRIPTIONS OF
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE ALONG WITH OTHER UNRELATED INFORMATION;
(B) AN INDIVIDUAL INTERACTING WITH A GIVEN PIECE OF DIGITAL
CONTENT IN A MANNER THAT INVOLVES HOVERING OVER, MUTING, PAUSING,
OR CLOSING THE DIGITAL CONTENT; OR
(C) AN AGREEMENT OBTAINED THROUGH THE USE OF DECEPTION.
(d) "SUPPLEMENTARY SUPPORT" MEANS TASKS PERFORMED TO
ASSIST A LICENSEE, REGISTRANT, CERTIFICATE HOLDER, OR OTHER
INDIVIDUAL LAWFULLY PERMITTED TO PROVIDE PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES
IN THE STATE IN THE DELIVERY OF PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES THAT DO NOT
INVOLVE THERAPEUTIC COMMUNICATION AND THAT ARE NOT
ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT. "SUPPLEMENTARY SUPPORT" INCLUDES, AT A
MINIMUM:
(I) PREPARING AND MAINTAINING CLIENT RECORDS, INCLUDING
THERAPY NOTES;
(II) ANALYZING DATA TO TRACK CLIENT PROGRESS OR IDENTIFY
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1195

TRENDS, SUBJECT TO REVIEW BY A LICENSEE, REGISTRANT, CERTIFICATE
HOLDER, OR OTHER INDIVIDUAL LAWFULLY PERMITTED TO PROVIDE
PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES IN THE STATE;
(III) IDENTIFYING AND ORGANIZING INTERNAL AND EXTERNAL
RESOURCES OR REFERRALS FOR CLIENT USE; AND
(IV) COLLECTING MENTAL HEALTH OR WELLNESS INFORMATION,
INCLUDING SYMPTOM FREQUENCY TRACKING; MOOD RATING SCALES; INTAKE
QUESTIONNAIRES AND RESPONSES; MEDICATION ADHERENCE LOGGING; SLEEP
AND ACTIVITY TRACKING; AND USE OF SIMILAR, STRUCTURED DATA
COLLECTION TOOLS.
(e) (I) "SYNCHRONOUS" MEANS INTERACTIONS OCCURRING
SIMULTANEOUSLY IN WHICH THERE IS ACTIVE PARTICIPATION BETWEEN THE
CLIENT AND THE LICENSEE, REGISTRANT, CERTIFICATE HOLDER, OR OTHER
INDIVIDUAL LEGALLY PERMITTED TO PROVIDE PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES IN
THE STATE.
(II) "SYNCHRONOUS" DOES NOT MEAN A REVIEW OF AN INTERACTION
AFTER THE INTERACTION HAS OCCURRED.
(f) (I) "THERAPEUTIC COMMUNICATION" MEANS ANY VERBAL,
NONVERBAL, OR WRITTEN INTERACTION CONDUCTED IN A CLINICAL OR
PROFESSIONAL SETTING THAT MEETS THE DEFINITION OF PSYCHOTHERAPY
SERVICES. "THERAPEUTIC COMMUNICATION" INCLUDES:
(A) DIRECT INTERACTIONS WITH CLIENTS FOR THE PURPOSE OF
UNDERSTANDING OR REFLECTING THEIR THOUGHTS, EMOTIONS, OR
EXPERIENCES;
(B) PROVIDING GUIDANCE, THERAPEUTIC STRATEGIES, OR
INTERVENTIONS DESIGNED TO ACHIEVE MENTAL OR BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
OUTCOMES;
(C) OFFERING EMOTIONAL SUPPORT, REASSURANCE, OR EMPATHY IN
RESPONSE TO PSYCHOLOGICAL OR EMOTIONAL DISTRESS;
(D) COLLABORATING WITH CLIENTS TO DEVELOP OR MODIFY
THERAPEUTIC GOALS OR TREATMENT PLANS; AND
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1195

(E) OFFERING BEHAVIORAL FEEDBACK INTENDED TO PROMOTE
PSYCHOLOGICAL GROWTH OR TO ADDRESS MENTAL OR BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
CONDITIONS.
(II) "THERAPEUTIC COMMUNICATION" DOES NOT INCLUDE GENERAL
WELLNESS EDUCATION, INSTRUCTION, OR GUIDANCE THAT IS INTENDED TO
PROMOTE OVERALL HEALTH AND WELL-BEING, RATHER THAN TO DIAGNOSE,
TREAT, OR ADDRESS A SPECIFIC MENTAL, EMOTIONAL, OR BEHAVIORAL
HEALTH CONCERN.
(2) A LICENSEE, REGISTRANT, CERTIFICATE HOLDER, OR OTHER
INDIVIDUAL LAWFULLY PERMITTED TO PROVIDE PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES
IN THE STATE MAY USE AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM TO ASSIST IN
PROVIDING ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT OR SUPPLEMENTARY SUPPORT FOR
PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES IF THE LICENSEE, REGISTRANT, CERTIFICATE
HOLDER, OR OTHER INDIVIDUAL LAWFULLY PERMITTED TO PROVIDE
PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES IN THE STATE MAINTAINS RESPONSIBILITY FOR
REVIEWING ANY OUTPUTS OF THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM USED
TO PROVIDE ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT OR SUPPLEMENTARY SUPPORT AND
SATISFIES THE REQUIREMENTS SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS
SECTION.
(3) THE USE OF AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM IS SUBJECT TO
AND MUST COMPLY WITH APPLICABLE STATE AND FEDERAL PRIVACY AND
SECURITY LAWS, INCLUDING THE "HEALTH INSURANCE PORTABILITY AND
ACCOUNTABILITY ACT OF 1996", PUB.L. 104-191, AND ITS IMPLEMENTING
REGULATIONS.
(4) (a) A LICENSEE, REGISTRANT, CERTIFICATE HOLDER, OR OTHER
INDIVIDUAL LAWFULLY PERMITTED TO PROVIDE PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES
IN THE STATE SHALL NOT USE AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM TO
RECORD OR TRANSCRIBE A CLIENT'S THERAPEUTIC SESSION, UNLESS:
(I) THE CLIENT OR THE CLIENT'S LEGALLY AUTHORIZED
REPRESENTATIVE IS INFORMED IN ADVANCE IN WRITING OF THE FOLLOWING:
(A) THAT AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM WILL BE USED; AND
(B) THE SPECIFIC PURPOSE FOR WHICH THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SYSTEM WILL BE USED;
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1195

(II) THE CLIENT OR THE CLIENT'S LEGALLY AUTHORIZED
REPRESENTATIVE CONSENTS IN WRITING TO THE USE OF THE ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM; AND
(III) THE CLIENT'S REFUSAL TO PROVIDE OR LATER DECISION TO
REVOKE THE CONSENT REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4)(a)(II) OF
THIS SECTION SHALL NOT BE USED AS A BASIS TO DENY PSYCHOTHERAPY
SERVICES.
(b) THE CONSENT REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4)(a)(II) OF
THIS SECTION FOR THE USE OF AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM TO
RECORD OR TRANSCRIBE THERAPEUTIC SESSIONS IS REQUIRED ONLY FOR THE
INITIAL USE OF THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM OCCURRING ON OR
AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION AND NOT FOR EACH
SUBSEQUENT THERAPEUTIC SESSION, UNLESS THE PURPOSE OR MANNER OF
USE MATERIALLY CHANGES.
(5) A LICENSEE, REGISTRANT, CERTIFICATE HOLDER, OR OTHER
INDIVIDUAL LAWFULLY PERMITTED TO PROVIDE PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES
IN THE STATE SHALL NOT ALLOW AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM TO
DO ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:
(a) INTERACT WITH CLIENTS IN ANY FORM OF THERAPEUTIC
COMMUNICATION WITHOUT SYNCHRONOUS, REAL-TIME INTERACTION
BETWEEN THE LICENSEE, REGISTRANT, CERTIFICATE HOLDER, OR OTHER
INDIVIDUAL LAWFULLY PERMITTED TO PROVIDE PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES
IN THE STATE, THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM, AND THE CLIENT; OR
(b) GENERATE THERAPEUTIC RECOMMENDATIONS OR TREATMENT
PLANS WITHOUT REVIEW AND APPROVAL BY THE LICENSEE, REGISTRANT,
CERTIFICATE HOLDER, OR OTHER INDIVIDUAL LAWFULLY PERMITTED TO
PROVIDE PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES IN THE STATE.
(6) (a) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTIONS (7) AND (8) OF THIS
SECTION, A LICENSEE, REGISTRANT, CERTIFICATE HOLDER, OR OTHER
INDIVIDUAL LAWFULLY PERMITTED TO PROVIDE PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES
IN THE STATE SHALL NOT USE AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM TO
PROVIDE, DIRECT, GUIDE, OR ATTEMPT TO PROVIDE, DIRECT, OR GUIDE
PSYCHOTHERAPY, CLINICAL INTERVENTION, COUNSELING, DIAGNOSIS,
TREATMENT PLANNING, OR ANY OTHER ACTIVITY THAT CONSTITUTES THE
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1195

PRACTICE OF PSYCHOTHERAPY WITH AN INDIVIDUAL OR A GROUP UNLESS THE
USE COMPLIES WITH SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) A LICENSEE, REGISTRANT, CERTIFICATE HOLDER, OR OTHER
INDIVIDUAL LAWFULLY PERMITTED TO PROVIDE PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES
IN THE STATE SHALL PROVIDE TO THE CLIENT DURING THE INITIAL CLIENT
CONTACT WRITTEN INFORMATION CONCERNING PROHIBITIONS SPECIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (6)(a) OF THIS SECTION ON THE USE OF ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEMS IN THE PRACTICE OF PSYCHOTHERAPY.
(7) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION PROHIBITS A LICENSEE, REGISTRANT,
CERTIFICATE HOLDER, OR OTHER INDIVIDUAL LAWFULLY PERMITTED TO
PROVIDE PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES IN THE STATE FROM USING AN
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM WITHIN AN ACCREDITED OR APPROVED
EDUCATIONAL, INSTRUCTIONAL, OR PROFESSIONAL TRAINING PROGRAM, SO
LONG AS THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM:
(a) IS USED SOLELY FOR EDUCATIONAL, ADMINISTRATIVE,
SIMULATION, OR TRAINING PURPOSES;
(b) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (5)(a) OF THIS SECTION, IS NOT
DEPLOYED, MARKETED, OR REPRESENTED AS A TOOL FOR USE WITH CLIENTS,
PATIENTS, OR MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC; AND
(c) FOR ANY SIMULATION, TRAINING MODULE, OR EDUCATIONAL
ACTIVITY THAT INCLUDES CONTENT RELATED TO CLINICAL
DECISION-MAKING, IS REVIEWED OR CONTROLLED BY AN INDIVIDUAL
LICENSED, CERTIFIED, REGISTERED, OR OTHERWISE LAWFULLY PERMITTED TO
PROVIDE PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES IN THE STATE.
(8) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION PROHIBITS A LICENSEE, REGISTRANT,
CERTIFICATE HOLDER, OR OTHER INDIVIDUAL LAWFULLY PERMITTED TO
PROVIDE PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES IN THE STATE FROM BEING INVOLVED
IN THE DEVELOPMENT, TESTING, OR EVALUATION OF AN ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM SOLELY FOR RESEARCH PURPOSES CONDUCTED UNDER
THE OVERSIGHT OF AN INSTITUTIONAL REVIEW BOARD REGISTERED WITH THE
UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, SO LONG
AS THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM IS NOT OFFERED TO CONSUMERS
OR USED TO PROVIDE PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES OUTSIDE OF THE RESEARCH
SETTING.
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1195

(9) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A LICENSEE, REGISTRANT,
CERTIFICATE HOLDER, OR OTHER INDIVIDUAL LAWFULLY PERMITTED TO
PROVIDE PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES IN THE STATE WHO USES OR
RECOMMENDS THE USE OF A TECHNOLOGY OR SERVICE THAT:
(a) PROVIDES SELF-HELP, THERAPEUTIC HOMEWORK, PATIENT
NAVIGATION, COACHING, GUIDED MEDITATION, JOURNALING, REFLECTIONS,
PSYCHOEDUCATION, GOAL SETTING, PROGRESS TRACKING, THERAPEUTIC
SESSION PREPARATION, THERAPEUTIC SESSION SUMMARIES, MOOD
MONITORING, MINDFULNESS EXERCISES, BREATHING EXERCISES, CRISIS
RESOURCE DIRECTORIES, SAFETY PLANNING, OR OTHER WELLNESS TOOLS
THAT:
(I) DO NOT DIAGNOSE OR TREAT MENTAL HEALTH DISORDERS; AND
(II) CLEARLY AND CONSPICUOUSLY DISCLOSE THAT THE
TECHNOLOGY OR SERVICE IS NOT A SUBSTITUTE FOR CLINICAL CARE; OR
(b) IS AUTHORIZED, APPROVED, CLEARED, OR GRANTED
ENFORCEMENT DISCRETION BY THE FEDERAL FOOD AND DRUG
ADMINISTRATION FOR AN INTENDED USE THAT INCLUDES THE DELIVERY OF
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH INTERVENTIONS, INCLUDING AN ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM, AND THAT:
(I) DOES NOT DIAGNOSE OR TREAT MENTAL HEALTH DISORDERS; AND
(II) CLEARLY AND CONSPICUOUSLY DISCLOSES THAT THE
TECHNOLOGY OR SERVICE IS NOT A SUBSTITUTE FOR CLINICAL CARE.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 6-1-1705.2 as
follows:
6-1-1705.2. Use of artificial intelligence systems - psychotherapy
services - prohibited practices - definitions.
(1) A PERSON SHALL NOT USE ANY TERM, LETTER, OR PHRASE IN THE
ADVERTISING, INTERFACE, OR OUTPUTS OF AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SYSTEM IN A MANNER THAT:
(a) INDICATES OR IMPLIES THAT THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1195

SYSTEM'S OUTPUT DATA IS BEING PROVIDED BY, IS ENDORSED BY, OR IS
EQUIVALENT TO SERVICES PROVIDED BY AN INDIVIDUAL LICENSED,
REGISTERED, OR CERTIFIED IN THE STATE PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 245 OF
TITLE 12 TO ENGAGE IN THE PRACTICE OF PSYCHOTHERAPY OR TO PROVIDE
PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES;
(b) REPRESENTS THAT THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM
PROVIDES PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES; OR
(c) REPRESENTS THAT A USER'S DATA IS CONFIDENTIAL IN A MANNER
THAT WOULD LEAD A REASONABLE USER TO BELIEVE THAT THE DATA IS
PROTECTED IN A MANNER COMPARABLE TO PRIVACY PROTECTIONS
AFFORDED BY THERAPIST-CLIENT CONFIDENTIALITY IN A RELATIONSHIP
BETWEEN A LICENSEE, REGISTRANT, CERTIFICATE HOLDER, OR OTHER PERSON
LAWFULLY PERMITTED TO PROVIDE PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES IN THE STATE
AND THE CLIENT.
(2) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION IMPOSES LIABILITY ON A LICENSEE,
REGISTRANT, CERTIFICATE HOLDER, OR OTHER INDIVIDUAL LEGALLY
PERMITTED TO PROVIDE PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES IN THE STATE FOR
DEFECTS IN, OR FAILURES OF, AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM THAT
ARE ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE DEVELOPER OR DEPLOYER OF THE ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM. THE LIABILITY OF A DEVELOPER OR DEPLOYER FOR
SUCH DEFECTS OR FAILURES IS GOVERNED BY APPLICABLE CONSUMER
PROTECTION LAW.
(3) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION PROHIBITS THE USE OF AN ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM WITHIN AN ACCREDITED OR APPROVED EDUCATIONAL,
INSTRUCTIONAL, OR PROFESSIONAL TRAINING PROGRAM, SO LONG AS THE
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM:
(a) IS USED SOLELY FOR EDUCATIONAL, ADMINISTRATIVE,
SIMULATION, OR TRAINING PURPOSES;
(b) NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 12-245-224.5 (5)(a), IS NOT
DEPLOYED, MARKETED, OR REPRESENTED AS A TOOL FOR USE WITH CLIENTS,
PATIENTS, OR MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC; AND
(c) FOR ANY SIMULATION, TRAINING MODULE, OR EDUCATIONAL
ACTIVITY THAT INCLUDES CONTENT RELATED TO CLINICAL
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1195

DECISION-MAKING, IS REVIEWED OR CONTROLLED BY AN INDIVIDUAL
LICENSED, CERTIFIED, REGISTERED, OR OTHERWISE LAWFULLY PERMITTED TO
PROVIDE PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES IN THE STATE.
(4) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION PROHIBITS THE DEVELOPMENT,
TESTING, OR EVALUATION OF AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM SOLELY
FOR RESEARCH PURPOSES CONDUCTED UNDER THE OVERSIGHT OF AN
INSTITUTIONAL REVIEW BOARD REGISTERED WITH THE UNITED STATES
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, SO LONG AS THE ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM IS NOT OFFERED TO CONSUMERS OR USED TO PROVIDE
PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES OUTSIDE OF THE RESEARCH SETTING.
(5) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THE USE OF A TECHNOLOGY OR
SERVICE THAT:
(a) PROVIDES SELF-HELP, THERAPEUTIC HOMEWORK, PATIENT
NAVIGATION, COACHING, GUIDED MEDITATION, JOURNALING, REFLECTIONS,
PSYCHOEDUCATION, GOAL SETTING, PROGRESS TRACKING, THERAPEUTIC
SESSION PREPARATION, THERAPEUTIC SESSION SUMMARIES, MOOD
MONITORING, MINDFULNESS EXERCISES, BREATHING EXERCISES, CRISIS
RESOURCE DIRECTORIES, SAFETY PLANNING, OR OTHER WELLNESS TOOLS
THAT:
(I) DO NOT DIAGNOSE OR TREAT MENTAL HEALTH DISORDERS; AND
(II) CLEARLY AND CONSPICUOUSLY DISCLOSE THAT THE
TECHNOLOGY OR SERVICE IS NOT A SUBSTITUTE FOR CLINICAL CARE; OR
(b) IS AUTHORIZED, APPROVED, CLEARED, OR GRANTED
ENFORCEMENT DISCRETION BY THE FEDERAL FOOD AND DRUG
ADMINISTRATION FOR AN INTENDED USE THAT INCLUDES THE DELIVERY OF
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH INTERVENTIONS, INCLUDING AN ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM, AND THAT:
(I) DOES NOT DIAGNOSE OR TREAT MENTAL HEALTH DISORDERS; AND
(II) CLEARLY AND CONSPICUOUSLY DISCLOSES THAT THE
TECHNOLOGY OR SERVICE IS NOT A SUBSTITUTE FOR CLINICAL CARE.
(6) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1195

REQUIRES:
(a) "ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM" HAS THE MEANING SET
FORTH IN SECTION 12-245-224.5.
(b) "PSYCHOTHERAPY" OR "PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES" HAS THE
MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 12-245-202.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3)
of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section, or
part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will
not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election to be
held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1195

(2) This act applies to actions taken on or after the applicable
effective date of this act.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1195